Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB879.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2168. Unlawful release of certain balloons.(a) Declaration of policy.--The Commonwealth has determined that the commission has sufficient interest in the maintenance and care of wildlife, livestock and pets to provide protections from the many hazards and threats that an intentional balloon release causes.(b) Violation.--Except as provided under subsection (d), it shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly release, organize the release of or knowingly cause to be released into the atmosphere a balloon that is inflated with a substance that is lighter than air.123456789101112131415161718 (c) Civil penalty.--A person who violates this section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $5 per balloon released. The civil penalty shall be paid into the Game Fund established under section 521 (relating to establishment and use of Game Fund).(d) Exceptions.--This section shall not apply to the following:(1) A balloon released by or on behalf of a higher education institution, an agency of the Commonwealth or the United States or under a contract with the Commonwealth, the United States or any other State, territory or government for educational research or scientific or meteorological purposes.(2) A hot air balloon that is recovered after launch.(3) A balloon released indoors, unless released with knowledge of an area open to the outdoor atmosphere that is in the immediate vicinity of the release.(4) A balloon that is attached to a radio tracking device.(5) A balloon that is released on the basis of a person's religious beliefs, practices or observances, as determined by rule of the commission properly regulated under section 2102 (relating to regulations), if prior written approval and a proper permit for balloon release is obtained through a government entity pursuant to the government entity's permitting process.(6) A balloon that is either biodegradable or photodegradable, as determined by rule of the commission properly regulated under section 2102.(e) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be 20250SB0879PN0991 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construed to limit the powers and duties of the commission under this title or its ability to promulgate regulations under this section.(f) Public notification.--The Department of Conservation and Natural Resources shall provide public notice of the provisions of this ban through the following methods:(1) A publicly accessible notice on the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources' publicly accessible Internet website outlining the prohibition of balloon releases.(2) The installation of permanent signage at the entrances of all State parks and State forests. The signage shall clearly communicate the restriction, be weather-resistant and feature text that is legible from a minimum distance of 80 feet.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Balloon." A nonporous flexible bag that is made of a nonbiodegradable or nonphotodegradable material or any material that requires more than a five minutes' contact with air or water to degrade, usually made of Mylar and latex, whether filled or unfilled."Government entity." Any:(1) branch, subdivision or agency of the Federal or State government;(2) political subdivision; or(3) municipal or local authority."Higher education institution." Any of the accredited following:20250SB0879PN0991 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A public institution of higher education as defined under section 2001-L of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(2) A rural regional college operating under Article XIX-G of the Public School Code of 1949.(3) A State-related institution as defined under section 1502-A of the Public School Code of 1949.(4) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology as authorized to operate under section 1903-B of the Public School Code of 1949."Person." An individual of at least 13 years of age, a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, nonprofit organization or any other association or legal entity as the context requires."Radio tracking device." An instrument that emanates a signal that allows an operator to determine the position of a released balloon."Religious belief." A principal established and maintained on the basis of a strong moral or ethical conviction in connection with any bona fide religious or denominational institution or organization operated, supervised or controlled by or in connection with a religious purpose. The term does not include activities that are superficial to a ceremony for nonreligious esthetics, including celebratory wedding exit, entrance or any theatrical points of ceremony.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0879PN0991 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526